Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.290

Director to make annual reports to governor.

The director shall report annually to the governor on the activities of the department.

[ 1977 c 75 s 66; 1967 c 32 s 5; 1965 c 28 s 1; 1961 ex.s. c 21 s 29. Formerly RCW 46.08.200.]